test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    bygd+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: bygd
    bygd+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: bygd
    bygd+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: bygd
    bygd+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: bygdar
    bygd+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: bygdir
    bygd+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: bygdum
    bygd+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: bygda
    bygd+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: bygdin
    bygd+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: bygdina
    bygd+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: bygdini
    bygd+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: bygdarinnar
    bygd+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: bygdirnar
    bygd+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: bygdunum
    bygd+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: bygdanna
